Florida, session 2026, HB119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 45.085, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
45.085 Application of Shari'a and other foreign law.—
(1) This act may be cited as the "No Shari'a Act."
(2) The Legislature recognizes the right to freely
contract under state law but finds that such right must be
circumscribed when the application of foreign law would violate
the fundamental liberties, rights, and privileges guaranteed by
the United States Constitution and the State Constitution,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb119-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 119 2026
including, but not limited to, equal protection, due process of
law, free exercise of religion, freedom of speech and the press,
the right of privacy, and the right of marriage.
(3) As used in this act, the term "foreign law, legal
code, or system" means any law, legal code, or system of a
jurisdiction outside of any state or territory of the United
States, including international organizations and tribunals.
(4)(a) A ruling or decision of a state court, arbitration
panel, tribunal, or administrative agency which is based, in
whole or in part, on Shari'a or any foreign law, legal code, or
system;
(b) A contract, or contractual provision if severable,
which provides for the choice of Shari'a or any foreign law,
legal code, or system; or
(c) A contract, or contractual provision if severable,
which grants jurisdiction to a foreign tribunal

is void and unenforceable if such ruling, decision, or provision
allows the application of Shari'a or any foreign law, legal
code, or system that denies the parties the fundamental
liberties, rights, and privileges guaranteed under the United
States Constitution or the State Constitution.
(5) This act does not:
(a) Disapprove or abrogate existing precedent of the
Florida Supreme Court;
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb119-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 119 2026
(b) Limit adjudication of ecclesiastical matters of a
religious organization, including the selection, appointment,
discipline, or removal of clergy or interpretation of doctrine;
(c) Apply to corporations, partnerships, or associations
that voluntarily subject themselves to foreign law or courts; or
(d) Apply where federal law preempts state law, including
obligations under treaties or international agreements.
Section 2. Section 47.122, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
47.122 Change of venue; convenience of parties or
witnesses or in the interest of justice; prohibition.—
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2), for the
convenience of the parties or witnesses or in the interest of
justice, any court of record may transfer any civil action to
any other court of record in which it might have been brought.
(2) A state court, arbitration panel, tribunal, or
administrative agency may not transfer any civil action under
this section if such transfer would result in the application of
Shari'a or any foreign law, legal code, or system that would
violate or likely violate the fundamental liberties, rights, and
privileges of the parties guaranteed under the United States
Constitution or the State Constitution.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb119-00